Maryland, session 2026, SB0035.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
19 That Section(s) 7–325 and 7–326 of Article – General Provisions of the Annotated Code of
20 Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 7–326.1 and 7–325, respectively.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0035*

2 SENATE BILL 35
1 SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
2 as follows:
3 Article – General Provisions
4 7–326.
5 THE NATURAL HISTORY SOCIETY OF MARYLAND IS THE STATE NATURAL
6 SCIENCE SCIENCES MUSEUM.
7 SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
8 October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.